Hawaii statutes.
§46-25.5 Expenses. Subject to section
78-32 and procedures prescribed by the director of finance of the county and
approved by the mayor, all officers and employees of each county shall be
entitled to travel or other necessary expenses in the performance of their
official duties as provided by ordinance. [L 1975, c 34, §1; am L 2016, c 158,
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next